District of Columbia statutes.
47-1059

American College of Cardiology and American College of Cardiology Foundation.

Property owned, occupied, and used by the American College of Cardiology and the American College of Cardiology Foundation, is hereby exempt from all taxation so long as the property continues to be so owned and occupied, and not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of § 47-1002 and § 47-1007, providing for exemption of certain real properties.

Sept. 8, 2004, D.C. Law 15-186, § 2, 51 DCR 5961
For Temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2 of American College of Cardiology Foundation Real Property Tax Exemption Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-45, December 9, 2003, law notification 51 DCR 1780).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of the American College of Cardiology Foundation Real Property Tax Exemption Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-120, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6613).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of American College of Cardiology Foundation Real Property Tax Exemption Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-218, November 7, 2003, 50 DCR 10043).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of American College of Cardiology and American College of Cardiology Foundation Real Property Tax Exemption Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-466, July 19, 2004, 51 DCR 7581).
Section 7053 of D.C. Law 17-219 repealed section 3 of D.C. Law 15-186.